California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) Establish a no-cost, interest-bearing maintenance account for each child in the department’s custody, and nonminor dependent in the department’s placement and care responsibility, for whom the department serves as representative payee. Interest earned shall be credited to the account. The county shall keep an itemized
 current account, in the manner required by federal law, of all income and expense items for each child’s and nonminor dependent’s maintenance account.

(2) Establish procedures for disbursing money from the accounts, including disbursing the net balance to the beneficiary upon release from care. The county shall use federal Social Security Administration funds, including benefits only for the following purposes:

(A) For the use and benefit of the child or nonminor dependent.

(B) For purposes determined by the county to be in the child’s or nonminor’s best interests.

(3) Establish and maintain a dedicated account in a financial institution for past-due monthly benefits that exceed six times the maximum monthly benefit payable, in accordance with federal
 law. The representative payee may deposit into the account established under this section any other funds representing past due benefits to the eligible individual, provided that the amount of the past due benefits is equal to or exceeds the maximum monthly benefit payable. Funds from the dedicated account shall not be used for basic maintenance costs. The use of funds from the dedicated account must be for the benefit of the child and are limited to expenditures for the following purposes:

(A) Medical treatment.

(B) Education or job skills training.

(C) Personal needs assistance.

(D) Special equipment.

(E) Housing modification.

(F) Therapy or rehabilitation.

(G) Other items or services, deemed appropriate by the federal Social Security Administration.

(4) Ensure the child’s or nonminor dependent’s federal survivors’ benefits are used for the child or nonminor dependent, consistent with Section 13756.

(e) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 65) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 623, Sec. 4.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13756.

(a) The Legislature finds that the State of California has utilized federal benefits administered by the federal Social Security Administration to offset the cost of foster care placement and that the utilization of these funds to support youth and young adults with their transition to adulthood would meet an urgent need for a population that is at high risk of homelessness. The Legislature finds that it is in a child’s best interests to ensure that federal survivors’ benefits for which they are eligible are available for their current and future use. It is the intent of the Legislature that federal Social Security Administration survivors’ benefits received by a child or youth in foster care shall not be utilized by the county placing agency to offset the cost of the child or youth’s care, and that placing
 agencies shall instead conserve those funds for the future use of the beneficiary.

(b) When the placing agency serves as the representative payee or in any other fiduciary capacity for a child or youth receiving federal Social Security Administration survivors’ benefits, the placing agency shall act in accordance with the Guide for Organizational Representative Payees, as published by the federal Social Security Administration, and shall do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that the child’s survivors’ benefits are not used to pay for, or to reimburse the placing agency for, any costs of the child’s care and supervision, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11460, and are conserved in accordance with paragraph (2).

(2) Monitor any applicable federal asset, resource, or income limits for the child’s benefits and
 ensure that the child’s best interests is served by conserving the benefits in a way that avoids termination of those benefits as a result of exceeding the federal asset, resource, or income limits, including establishing and maintaining a dedicated account on behalf of the child and preserves eligibility for other benefits to which the child may be entitled.

(3) Provide, upon request, an accounting to the child if the child is 12 years of age or older and the child’s attorney of how, and in what amount, the child’s resources, including any benefits administered by the federal Social Security Administration, have been conserved, consistent with the accounting report requirements described in Sections 404.2065 and 416.665 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and the county’s consideration of the child’s best interests, consistent with federal guidance.

(c) Any reference
 to “federal survivors’ benefits” or “Social Security Administration survivors’ benefits” in this section shall have the same meaning as benefits to which a child of an individual who dies is entitled pursuant to Section 402(d) of Title 42 of the United States Code. 

(d) (1) The placing agency shall notify the child, the child’s attorney, and the child’s parents or guardians, before, or concurrent with, all of the following:

(A) Any application for benefits administered by the federal Social Security Administration made by the agency on the child’s behalf pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13757.

(B) Any application by the placing agency to become a representative payee for benefits administered by the federal Social Security Administration on the child’s behalf.

(C) Any decisions or communications from the federal Social Security Administration regarding an application for benefits described in subparagraph (A).

(D) Any action taken by the agency regarding an application for benefits described in subdivision (c) of Section 13757.

(2) In addition to notification, as required under paragraph (1), the placing agency shall also provide the information in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) to the child, the child’s attorney, and the child’s parents or guardians upon request.

(e) At least 30 days before the child’s exit from foster care to permanency, if the placing agency is the representative payee, the placing agency shall collaborate with the child, the child’s attorney, and the child’s parents or
 guardians if the child is exiting to reunification or the child’s guardian or adoptive parent if the child is exiting to guardianship or adoption, to begin transfer or control and responsibility for any funds conserved under this section to the child’s parent, guardian, adoptive parent, or the child if the child has exited after 18 years of age, unless the child chooses to select another representative payee. Transfer of conserved funds shall be made in accordance with the federal Social Security Administration’s rules for changes of representative payee.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, or 30 days after the department issues the necessary all-county letters and informing materials to county placing agencies, whichever is later.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 623, Sec. 6.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13757.

(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), every youth over 16 years of age who is in foster care under the supervision of the county child welfare department, juvenile probation department, or tribal organization, if the tribal organization requests the screening from the county, shall be screened by the county for potential eligibility for the federal Social Security Administration benefits.

(2) The screening required in paragraph (1) shall occur when the foster youth is at least 16 years of age and not older than 17 years of age. This does not preclude counties from screening youth for eligibility prior to the youth attaining 16 years of age. An application shall be submitted to the federal Social Security Administration on behalf of any youth who is
 screened as being likely to be eligible for any benefits administered by the federal Social Security Administration. To the extent possible, for a foster youth approaching 18 years of age, the application shall be timed to allow for a determination of eligibility by the federal Social Security Administration before the youth’s 18th birthday.

(3) The screening required in paragraph (1) shall occur for a nonminor dependent if any of the following are true:

(A) The nonminor dependent was not screened before the youth’s 18th birthday as required in paragraph (2).

(B) The nonminor dependent has had a change of circumstance, including a medical condition that is expected to last more than one year.

(C) The nonminor dependent has been approved for regional
 center services since the last screening.

(D) The nonminor dependent, their court-appointed attorney, or a member of their child and family team requests screening.

(E) The juvenile court orders the county to screen the nonminor dependent.

(F) The county determines the screening is appropriate based on the nonminor dependent having a physical or mental impairment that limits their ability to work.

(4) An application shall be submitted to the federal Social Security Administration on behalf of any nonminor dependent who is screened as being likely to be eligible for federal Social Security Administration benefits and consents to the application.

(b) In carrying out the requirements of
 subdivision (a) for a youth receiving federally funded AFDC-FC benefits, the county shall, if necessary, forego federally funded AFDC-FC and instead use nonfederal AFDC-FC resources to fund the placement in the month of application or in the month after making an application, and to subsequently reclaim federally funded AFDC-FC, in order to ensure that the youth meets all of the SSI eligibility requirements in a single month while the application is pending, as provided by federal law and regulation. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 11402, this section shall apply to a foster youth regardless of their federal AFDC-FC eligibility.

(c) For foster youth whose applications for federal Social Security Administration benefits are denied, the county placing agency shall file, or cause to be filed, a request for reconsideration with the federal Social Security Administration. If the request for reconsideration is denied, then the county shall
 subsequently file an appeal to the federal Social Security Administration and, if necessary, file an appeal to the Appeals Council of the federal Social Security Administration. The county is not required to file a request for reconsideration or an appeal if the county does not possess the information or evidence to support an appeal after making efforts to acquire that information, or other reasons that shall be documented in the case plan.

(d) The assistance by the county, as the authorized representative, or by any other entity on behalf of the nonminor dependent, provided pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c) shall adhere to the guidelines of the federal Social Security Administration, as specified in Section 416.1540 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations, which includes, but is not limited to, gathering and submitting relevant records to the federal Social Security Administration, notifying the youth of any denials or terminations
 of aid, and assisting with timely requesting an appeal, as needed. The county may contract with legal services organizations or other entities, or may partner with other county agencies, to fulfill these duties.

(e) (1) When a nonminor dependent has been approved for SSI payments pursuant to this section, but is receiving a federally funded AFDC-FC benefit in an amount that exceeds the SSI payment, causing the SSI payment to be placed in suspense, the county placing agency shall, during at least 1 month of every 12-month period, beginning with the date that the SSI benefit is placed in suspense, forego the federally funded AFDC-FC benefit and instead use nonfederal AFDC-FC resources to supplement the SSI benefit that the youth receives during that month. The county shall subsequently reclaim the federally funded AFDC-FC benefit in the following month.

(2) If
 the county is the nonminor dependent’s representative payee, the county shall inform the federal Social Security Administration that the youth is not receiving any federal financial participation during that month in order to permit the nonminor dependent to receive an SSI benefit during a single month in every 12-month period.

(3) If the county is not the nonminor dependent’s representative payee, then for the period that the nonminor dependent remains in foster care, in order to permit the nonminor dependent to receive an SSI benefit during a single month in every 12-month period, the county shall assist the nonminor dependent or the nonminor dependent’s representative payee in providing this information to the federal Social Security Administration and keeping track of the number of months that the nonminor dependent’s SSI payment has been placed in suspense.

(f) Beginning in
 the 2011–12 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 67) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 623, Sec. 8.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Nonmedical Care Facilities [13900. - 13922.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [13900. - 13902.]

13900.

The object and purpose of this chapter is to provide a coordinated, comprehensive approach to providing assistance and out-of-home care in nonmedical care facilities for recipients of public assistance who qualify for aid under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13000) of this part, and who are capable of self-care and self-direction but are so impaired that such persons require or can function more effectively if protected by a living arrangement that meets their particular situation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

13901.

It is further the purpose of this chapter to give recognition to the fact that persons who require provision of an out-of-home living arrangement present a common set of personal problems, whether they are classified as aged, blind or disabled.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

13902.

Insofar as practicable and consistent with the best interest of the recipients, the provisions of this chapter shall be administered as a separate program which provides the aged, blind or disabled persons who qualify under the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13000) of this part with a unified and comprehensive program of care. In developing administrative plans to implement the provisions of this chapter, priority shall be given to the plan utilizing the most favorable federal cost-sharing formula.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Out-of-Home Care [13910. - 13913.]

13910.

The purpose of this article is to provide out-of-home care to those recipients of public assistance for whom care in their own homes is impractical; however, the provisions of this article shall not duplicate intermediate care or other out-of-home facility services provided under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

13911.

The director shall, by regulation, establish standards for specialized out-of-home care. The department shall establish rate schedules which include separate rates for room and board, for the specialized care component and for personal and incidental needs.

The director shall develop an overall plan which integrates the system of out-of-home nonmedical care facility services covered by the provision of this chapter with the system of medical care facility services covered by the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part. The purpose of such overall plan shall be to maintain an appropriate balance between nonmedical and medical facilities to the end that recipients of public assistance or persons otherwise defined as needy by the provisions of this code are given the care they require at the lowest possible cost.

The plan established by the director pursuant to this section may include the use of an interdisciplinary review process to insure that persons are not placed or retained in medical care facilities when appropriate care can otherwise be provided at lower cost.

Nothing in this article shall be interpreted to preclude any facility licensed under the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code from providing out-of-home care services, provided such facilities meet the standards established by the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

13912.

In the establishment of the rate schedules for out-of-home care, the director shall consider and reflect in the rate schedule annually, in addition to any other factors he deems to be relevant, the availability of such homes in the community, cost of living, appropriateness of the facility, the cost of providing care under the required standards, activity programs required for the maintenance or restoration of function of aged and disabled persons and the cost of differentials of room, board and care required for persons of differing ages and needs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

13913.

The director shall submit an annual report to the Legislature by March 1 of each year setting forth pertinent facts on the operation of the program established by this chapter and its significance in relation to the out-of-home care services of the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [13920. - 13922.]

13920.

For a person living in a nonmedical out-of-home care facility the department may establish varying allowances for room, board and care, provided that the minimum allowance shall not be less than five hundred sixty-three dollars ($563) per month and the amount so established shall be subject to the provisions set forth in Section 12201.

The room, board, and care allowance established pursuant to this section does not include the personal and incidental needs established pursuant to Section 13921.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 97, Sec. 16.   Effective June 30, 1991.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 30 of Ch. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

13921.

The department shall establish a range of amounts for the personal and incidental needs of recipients in out-of-home care under this chapter provided that the minimum amount for personal and incidental needs shall not be less than eighty-three dollars ($83) per month and that the range of amounts so established shall be subject to the provisions set forth in Section 12201.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 97, Sec. 17.   Effective June 30, 1991.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 30 of Ch. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

13922.

The sum of the allowances established in Sections 13920 and 13921 shall not be less than five hundred ten dollars ($510) and shall be the sum for purposes of subdivision (g) of Section 12200. Should such sum result in individuals or members of couples becoming ineligible for categorically needy medical services under Section 14005.1, then the sum shall be reduced separately for individuals to the highest whole dollar amount which will allow all individuals to retain eligibility under Section 14005.1 and for members of couples to the highest whole dollar amount which will allow all members of couples to retain such eligibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 551, Sec. 13.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Basic Health Care [14000. - 14199.97.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [14000. - 14042.2.]

14000.

The purpose of this chapter is to afford to qualifying individuals health care and related remedial or preventive services, including related social services that are necessary for those receiving health care under this chapter.

The intent of the Legislature is to provide, to the extent practicable, through the provisions of this chapter, for health care for California residents who lack sufficient income to meet the costs of health care and whose other assets are so limited that their application toward the costs of that care would jeopardize the person or family’s future minimum self-maintenance and security. It is intended that, whenever possible and feasible, all of the following shall apply:

(a) The means employed shall allow, to the
 extent practicable, eligible persons to secure health care in the same manner employed by the public generally, and without discrimination or segregation based purely on their economic disability. The means employed shall include an emphasis on efforts to arrange and encourage access to health care through enrollment in organized, managed care plans of the type available to the general public.

(b) The benefits available under this chapter shall not duplicate those provided under other federal or state laws or under other contractual or legal entitlements of the person or persons receiving them.

(c) In the administration of this chapter and in establishing the means to be used to provide access to health care to persons eligible under this chapter, the department shall emphasize and take advantage of both the efficient organization and ready accessibility and availability of health
 care facilities and resources through enrollment in managed health care plans and new and innovative fee-for-service managed health care plan approaches to the delivery of health care services.

(d) This section shall become operative January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 291, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 50.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14000.01.

The department shall seek federal approval, if necessary, and shall issue all-plan letters or similar instructions to implement subdivision (d) of Section 1367.25 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 499, Sec. 5.   (SB 999)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14000.03.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1396a(a)(11)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code provides that California’s state plan for medical assistance under the Medicaid program must “provide for entering into cooperative arrangements with the State agencies responsible for administering or supervising the administration of health services and vocational rehabilitation services in the State looking toward maximum utilization of such services in the provision of medical assistance under the plan.”

(b) In furtherance of Section 1396a(a)(11)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code and Section 7560 of the Government Code, it is the intent of the Legislature to maximize the amount of federal and state funds continually available under agreements identified in Section 1396a(a)(11)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code and entered into by the State Department of Health Services by making later-appropriated and budgeted funds immediately encumbered and available for expenditure under agreements by operation of law.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon additional funds being appropriated and budgeted for the support of the services identified within the scope of work of an agreement of the type identified in Section 1396a (a)(11)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code and previously entered into by the State Department of Health Services, the amount of the
 encumbrance in such an agreement shall be amended, by operation of law, to reflect the newly appropriated and budgeted funds.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, once an agreement of the type identified in Section 1396a (a)(11)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code is entered into by the State Department of Health Services, the agreement shall continue in effect indefinitely and need not be amended unless the State Department of Health Services changes the scope of work to be provided under the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 41.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14000.05.

The State Department of Health Services shall consider the special needs and requirements of rural hospitals in California that are financially distressed and in danger of closure. The department may provide technical assistance and other appropriate assistance and relief on Medi-Cal program policies, reimbursement issues, and Medi-Cal operational and procedural problems to financially distressed rural hospitals, when appropriate, in order to preserve the availability of health care services in rural California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 999, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14000.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that health care services available under this chapter shall be at least equivalent to the level provided in 1970–71.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 577.)
-------------------------------------------

14000.2.

During the time this chapter is effective and notwithstanding other provisions of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Health and Safety Code, the board of supervisors of each county may prescribe rules which authorize the county hospital to integrate its services with those of other hospitals into a system of community service which offers free choice of hospitals to those requiring hospital care. The intent of this section is to eliminate discrimination or segregation based on economic disability so that the county hospital and other hospitals in the community share in providing services to paying patients and to those who qualify for care in public
 medical care programs. In prescribing rules under which the county hospital may provide community hospital services described in this section, the board of supervisors shall provide a basis under which patients may be attended by their own personal physicians who are professionally qualified for staff membership in the county hospital.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law or provisions contained in a county charter, the board of supervisors of any county may transfer the maintenance, operation and management or ownership of the county hospital to the University of California or any other public agency or community nonprofit corporation empowered to operate a hospital facility upon a finding that the community services provided by the hospital could be more efficiently, effectively or economically provided by the transferee than the county. If such transfer be made to the University of California or to any other public agency empowered to operate a hospital
 facility the transfer of control or ownership may be made with or without the payment of a purchase price by the transferee and otherwise upon such terms and conditions as the parties may mutually agree, but if the transfer be to a community nonprofit corporation, the board of supervisors shall comply with all other provisions of law relating to the sale, lease, or transfer of public property by a county; and provided that in any event the transaction shall include such terms and conditions as the board of supervisors find necessary to insure that the transfer will constitute an ongoing material benefit to the county and its residents.

The intent of this section is to permit the implementation of programs for the consolidation of public hospital services in order to permit the more effective use of existing hospital facilities and retard the spiraling costs of medical care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 709, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14000.3.

To the extent permitted by federal law, the director may enter into contracts with the Secretary of Health, Education, and Welfare to obtain or provide fiscal intermediary services for all persons who are receiving benefits under this chapter, who are also recipients of benefits under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14000.4.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Medi-Cal Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1030.)
-------------------------------------------

14000.5.

On a regional pilot project basis, to the extent authorized by law, the director may enter into contracts with one or more nonprofit organizations to perform the functions of the department’s Office of the Ombudsman. These activities may include outreach, community education and training about health care consumer rights and responsibilities, including the production and distribution of consumer-oriented material, individual consumer assistance, including counseling, advice, assistance, education, advocacy, and referral as appropriate, establishing and operating a
 database to analyze the nature of the inquiries and requests for assistance, and training of department or county staff. These services may be made available to any person who may be eligible for or is receiving benefits under this chapter. Funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the support of the Office of the Ombudsman may be allocated for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 42.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14000.6.

(a) The Office of Medicare Innovation and Integration is hereby established within the department.

(b) The office shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide focused leadership and expertise on innovative models for Medicare beneficiaries in California, including Medicare-only beneficiaries, and individuals dually eligible for the Medicare and Medi-Cal programs.

(2) Support new and existing models and strategies to benefit Medicare-only beneficiaries in California, in collaboration with local, state, and federal partners and other stakeholders.

(3) Consider and develop strategies for Medicare and Medi-Cal enrollment, benefits, health care delivery systems, and data sharing and reporting, to improve health outcomes, quality, equity, and cost effectiveness.

(4) Develop innovative approaches to integrated models of care and coordinated access to long-term services and supports for Medicare-only beneficiaries and dually eligible beneficiaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 361.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14000.7.

(a) The department shall provide assistance to any applicant or beneficiary that requests help with the application or redetermination process to the extent required by federal law.

(b) The assistance provided under subdivision (a) shall be available to the individual in person, over the telephone, and online, and in a manner that is accessible to individuals with disabilities and those who have limited
 English proficiency.

(c) To the extent otherwise required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than July 1, 2015. The department may thereafter readopt the emergency regulations pursuant to that chapter. The adoption and readoption, by the department, of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(d) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal
 financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 3.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14000.8.

(a) (1) Commencing on January 1, 2026, and each
 month thereafter, a county with a call center for Medi-Cal applicants or beneficiaries applying for, renewing, or requesting help in obtaining or maintaining Medi-Cal coverage shall collect and submit to the department call-center data metrics, including, but not limited to, total call volume, average call wait times by language, and the average call abandonment
 rate.

(2) The department shall prepare a report, excluding any personally identifiable information, on call-center data as described in paragraph (1). The department shall post the report on the department’s internet website on a quarterly basis no later than 45 calendar days after the conclusion of each quarter. The initial report on call-center data described in paragraph (1) shall be due on May 15, 2026.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section, without taking any regulatory action, by means of an all-county letter or similar instruction. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14001.

Health care as administered under this chapter shall be considered a component of public social services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

14001.1.

It is the intention of the Legislature, whenever feasible, that the needs of categorically needy persons for health care and related remedial or preventive services be met under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1354, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14001.11.

(a) The department shall implement the federal requirements described in Section 1396u-5 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) In each of the several counties of the state, the eligibility and enrollment functions required under Section 1396u-5(a)(2) and (3) of Title 42 of the United States Code, which may include, but are not limited to, determining eligibility and offering enrollment for premium and cost sharing subsidies made available under and in accordance with
 Section 1395w-114 of Title 42 of the United States Code, shall be a county function and responsibility, subject to the direction, authority, and regulations of the department. The department shall request input from the counties as to the potential cost of implementing these provisions, and shall consider that input in developing the budget.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions, with input from the counties. Thereafter, the department may adopt regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(d) The department shall seek approval of any amendments to the state plan, necessary to
 implement this section, for purposes of federal financial participation under Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.). Notwithstanding any other law and only when all necessary federal approvals have been obtained, this section, with the exception of the Phased-Down State Contribution, as described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1396u-5 of Title 42 of the United States Code, shall be implemented only to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 80, Sec. 20.2.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.

Health care granted under the provisions of this chapter is held subject to the provisions of any law hereafter enacted amending, repealing, or supplementing in whole or in part the provisions of this chapter, and subject to the rules and regulations of the department. No recipient of health care under this chapter shall have any claim for compensation or otherwise because his service is affected in any way by any such amending, repealing, or supplemental act, or by any such rule or regulation or by any addition, amendment, or repeal of such rules or regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.5.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Annuity” means a contract that names an annuitant and gives a person or entity the right to receive periodic payments of a fixed or variable sum for a described period of time, which may include a lump-sum payment or periodic payments upon the death of the annuitant.

(b) “Community spouse” means the spouse of an institutionalized spouse.

(c) “Home and facility care” means the following services that are subject to Medi-Cal reimbursement:

(1) Nursing facility care services.

(2) A level of care in any institution equivalent to that of nursing facility care services.

(3) Home- or community-based care services furnished under a waiver granted pursuant to subsection (c) or (d) of Section 1396n of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) “Institutionalized spouse” means any individual to whom all of the following apply:

(1) The
 individual is in a medical institution or nursing facility or is a person who is receiving institutional or noninstitutional services from a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly organization pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), and is likely to meet that requirement for at least 30 consecutive days.

(2) The individual is married to a spouse who is not in a medical institution or nursing facility, or to a spouse who is not receiving services from a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly organization pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591).

(3) Except for purposes of Sections 14005.7, 14005.12, 14005.16, and 14005.17, an individual who is admitted to a medical institution or nursing facility on or after September 30, 1989, and who applies for Medi-Cal benefits on or after January 1, 1990, or a Medi-Cal recipient who is admitted